Louisiana, session 2026, SB451.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The heading of Chapter 30-A of Title 46 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes
of 1950 and R.S. 46:2261, 2262, the introductory paragraph of 2262.1, 2262.1(4) and (12),
and 2263 through 2267 are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 30-A. IDENTIFICATION OF EARLY HEARING
LOSS IN INFANTS LAW DETECTION AND INTERVENTION
§2261. Short title
This Chapter may be cited as the "Identification of Hearing Loss in Infants
Law" "Newborn Hearing Screening Law".
§2262. Purpose
A. The purpose of the program for early identification of hearing loss is to
identify deaf or hard of hearing infants at the earliest possible time so that medical
treatment, early audiological evaluation, selection of amplification, and early
educational intervention can be provided. hearing detection and intervention is to
support the early identification of infants who are d/Deaf, hard of hearing, or
present a risk factor for developing hearing loss through screening and
audiological evaluation and to ensure that parents and guardians of such infants
Page 1 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 451 ENROLLED
are provided an opportunity for referral to early intervention and family
support services. Early detection and intervention ensures the language and
communication needs of children who are d/Deaf or hard of hearing are
addressed as early as possible.
B. Early hearing detection, educational intervention, and coordinated
systems of care early audiological services are required under Section 399M of the
Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. 280g-1, as amended by the Early Hearing
Detection and Intervention (EHDI) Act of 2010, EHDI Act of 2017, Public Law
115-71, EHDI Act of 2022, Public Law 117-241, and the Education of the
Handicapped Act, Amendments of 1986, Public Law 99-457.
C. Early identification and management of the deaf coordinated support for
infants who are d/Deaf or hard of hearing infant are essential if that infant is to
acquire the vital language and speech skills needed to achieve maximum potential
educationally, emotionally, and socially. are critical for maximizing opportunities
for communicative and linguistic competencies and providing access to literacy,
education, and social-emotional development.
D. Appropriate Newborn hearing screening and early identification of
newborns and infants with hearing loss who are d/Deaf or hard of hearing and
subsequent opportunities for referral to early intervention and family support
services will therefore serve the public purpose of promoting the healthy
development of children and reducing public expenditures for health care, special
education, and related services.
§2262.1. Bill of Rights
In order to ensure that children who are deaf d/Deaf or hard of hearing have
the same rights and potential to become independent and self-actualizing as children
who are not deaf d/Deaf or hard of hearing, the Deaf d/Deaf and Hard of Hearing
Child's Bill of Rights is established so that children who are deaf d/Deaf or hard of
hearing are entitled:
* * *
(4) To adult role models who are deaf d/Deaf or hard of hearing.
Page 2 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 451 ENROLLED
* * *
(12) Where appropriate, to have deaf d/Deaf and hard of hearing adults
directly involved in determining the extent, content, and purpose of all programs that
affect their education.
§2263. Definitions
Except where the context clearly indicates otherwise, in this Chapter:
(1) "Advisory council" means the advisory council created pursuant to R.S.
46:2265.
(2) "Congenital deafness" means the presence of deafness at birth.
(3) "Deaf" means a hearing level identified as severe to profound, with
some or complete absence of auditory sensitivity, and is most often represented
with a lowercase letter "d". The term "Deaf", when written or expressed with
an uppercase letter "D", specifically refers to a group of deaf individuals who
identify as a cultural and linguistic minority with specific languages, namely
visual or tactile methods of communication, and social mores.
(4) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Health.
(5) "Early intervention" means appropriate services for a child who is
d/Deaf or hard of hearing, in accordance with the EHDI Act of 2017, including
nonmedical services and ensuring that the family of the child is:
(a) Provided comprehensive, consumer-oriented information about the
full range of family support, training, information services, and language
acquisition in oral and visual modalities.
(b) Given the opportunity to consider and obtain the full range of such
appropriate services, educational and program placements, and other options
for the child from highly qualified providers.
(6) "Hard of hearing" means a hearing level identified as ranging from
mild to severe, with some absence of auditory sensitivity.
(7) "Hearing screening" means utilizing hearing screening technology
to identify infants in need of additional audiological testing to determine
hearing status. Procedures may include auditory brainstem response (ABR)
Page 3 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 451 ENROLLED
screening, otoacoustic emissions (OAE) screening, and other devices approved
by the office upon recommendation of the advisory council.
(3)(8) "Deaf Infant who is d/Deaf or hard of hearing infant" means an infant
who has a disorder of the auditory system of any type or degree, causing hearing loss
sufficient to interfere with the development of language and speech skills. is d/Deaf
or hard of hearing from a congenital or acquired nature, unilateral or bilateral,
of any degree from minimal to profound, and of any type, including a
conductive, sensory, sensorineural, auditory neuropathy dyssynchrony, or
mixed hearing condition.
(4)(9) "Infants susceptible to a hearing disability with risk factors" means
those infants who are susceptible to hearing loss because they have one or more risk
factors for developing delayed onset or progressive permanent childhood
hearing loss.
(10) "Joint Committee on Infant Hearing" or "JCIH" means a national
group of representatives that work to address issues that are important to the
early identification, intervention, and follow-up care of infants who are d/Deaf
or hard of hearing.
(11) "Language" means a system of conventional spoken, signed, or
written means by which human beings, as members of a social group and
participants in its culture, express themselves. The functions of language in this
context include communication, identity, connection, cognition, and advocacy.
(12) "Language systems" means a system of communication approaches
including but not limited to American Sign Language, spoken English, Pidgin
Signed English, Manually Coded English, bimodal bilingualism, total
communication, and cued speech.
(5)(13) "Office" means the office of public health within the department
Louisiana Department of Health.
(6)(14) "Program" means the program that the office of public health
establishes to provide for the early identification and follow-up of infants susceptible
to a hearing disability, of deaf or hard of hearing infants, and of infants who have a
Page 4 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 451 ENROLLED
risk factor for developing progressive hearing loss. support the early detection of
infants who are d/Deaf or hard of hearing through newborn hearing screening,
outpatient follow-up screening, audiological evaluation, and referral to and
enrollment in early intervention and family support services.
(15) "Refer" means the result of newborn hearing screening that
indicates further testing is needed.
(7)(16)(a) "Risk factors" means those criteria or factors, any one of which
identifies an infant as being susceptible to as classified by JCIH which may result
in early, progressive, or delayed onset permanent childhood hearing loss.
(b) The risk factors that identify those neonates, infants from birth through
the first twenty-eight days, who are susceptible to sensorineural hearing loss
Perinatal risk factors, as classified by JCIH guidelines include the following:
(i) Family history of congenital or delayed onset childhood sensorineural
impairment early, progressive, or delayed onset permanent childhood hearing
loss.
(ii) Congenital infection known or suspected to be associated with
sensorineural hearing loss such as toxoplasmosis, syphilis, rubella, cytomegalovirus,
and herpes Neonatal intensive care of more than five days.
(iii) Craniofacial anomalies including morphologic abnormalities of the pinna
and ear canal, absent philtrum, low hairline, et cetera Hyperbilirubinemia with
exchange transfusion regardless of length of stay.
(iv) Birth weight less than one thousand five hundred grams or less than three
and three tenths pounds Aminoglycoside administration for more than five days.
(v) Hyperbilirubinemia at a level exceeding indication for exchange
transfusion Asphyxia or hypoxic ischemic encephalopathy.
(vi) Ototoxic medications, including but not limited to the aminoglycosides
used for more than five days, such as gentamicin, tobramycin, kanamycin,
streptomycin, and loop diuretics used in combination with aminoglycosides
Extracorporeal membrane oxygenation (ECMO).
(vii) Bacterial meningitis In utero infections, such as herpes, rubella,
Page 5 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 451 ENROLLED
syphilis, toxoplasmosis, Zika, and cytomegalovirus (CMV).
(viii) Severe depression at birth, which may include infants with Apgar scores
of zero to three at five minutes or those who fail to initiate spontaneous respiration
by ten minutes or those with hypotonia persisting to two hours of age Certain birth
conditions or findings such as craniofacial malformations including microtia,
atresia, ear dysplasia, oral facial clefting, white forelock, microphthalmia,
congenital microcephaly, congenital or acquired hydrocephalus, and temporal
bone abnormalities.
(ix) Prolonged mechanical ventilation for a duration equal to or greater than
ten days, such as persistent pulmonary hypertension.
(x)(ix) Stigmata or other findings associated with a syndrome known to
include sensorineural hearing loss, such as Waardenburg or Usher Syndrome.
(xi)(x) Other risk factors added or deleted by the office of public health upon
recommendation of the advisory council for early identification of deaf d/Deaf or
hard of hearing children.
(c) The factors that identify those infants aged twenty-nine days to two years
who are susceptible to sensorineural hearing loss Perinatal or postnatal risk
factors, as classified by JCIH include the following:
(i) Parent or caregiver concerns regarding hearing, speech, language, or
developmental delay. Culture-positive infections associated with sensorineural
hearing loss including confirmed bacterial and viral meningitis or encephalitis,
especially herpes viruses and varicella.
(ii) Bacterial meningitis. Events associated with hearing loss such as
significant head trauma, basal skull or temporal bone fractures, or
chemotherapy.
(iii) Neonatal risk factors that may be associated with progressive
sensorineural hearing loss, such as cytomegalovirus, prolonged mechanical
ventilation, and inherited disorders. Caregiver concern regarding hearing, speech,
language, developmental delay, or developmental regression.
(iv) Head trauma, especially with either longitudinal or transverse fracture
Page 6 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 451 ENROLLED
of the temporal bone.
(v) Stigmata or other findings associated with syndromes known to include
sensorineural hearing loss, such as Waardenburg or Usher Syndrome.
(vi) Ototoxic medications, including but not limited to the aminoglycosides
used for more than five days, such as gentamicin, tobramycin, kanamycin,
streptomycin, and loop diuretics used in combination with aminoglycosides.
(vii) Neurodegenerative disorders such as neurofibromatosis, myoclonic
epilepsy, Werdnig-Hoffman disease, Tay-Sachs disease, infantile Gaucher's disease,
Niemann-Pick disease, any metachromatic leukodystrophy, or any infantile
demyelinating neuropathy.
(viii) Childhood infectious diseases known to be associated with
sensorineural hearing loss, such as mumps or measles.
(ix)(iv) Other risk factors added or deleted by the office of public health upon
recommendation of the advisory council for early identification of deaf or hard of
hearing children created in R.S. 46:2265.
(8) "Screening for hearing loss" means employing a device for identifying
whether an infant has a disorder of the auditory system, but may not necessarily
provide a comprehensive determination of hearing thresholds in the speech range.
Procedures may include auditory brainstem response (ABR) screening, evoked
otoacoustic emissions (EOAE) screening, and other devices approved by the office
upon recommendation of the advisory council.
(17) "Sign language" means a visual-spatial communication system
consisting of manual gestures, facial expressions, and body language. Sign
language uses vision to receptively understand communication and movement
to expressively communicate.
(18) "Spoken language" means an audible-verbal communication system
consisting of sounds. Spoken language uses audition to receptively understand
communication and voice to expressively communicate.
(19) "Young adult" means an individual between eighteen to twenty-six
years of age as defined by the National Institutes of Health.
Page 7 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 451 ENROLLED
§2264. Identification of hearing loss in infants Early detection and intervention
for children who are d/Deaf or hard of hearing
A. The office shall establish, in consultation with the advice of the Louisiana
Commission for the Deaf and the advisory council created in R.S. 46:2265 and
other key constituents, a program for the early identification and follow-up of
infants susceptible to a hearing disability, deaf or hard of hearing infants, and infants
susceptible to developing progressive hearing loss hearing detection and
intervention of infants and children who are d/Deaf or hard of hearing. The
program shall, at a minimum:
(1) Develop criteria or factors to identify those infants who are likely deaf or
hard of hearing and infants who may develop a progressive hearing loss, including
the risk factors set forth in this Chapter, and develop a susceptibility questionnaire
for infant hearing loss. Collect and track data related to newborn hearing
screening, risk factor reporting, audiological testing, and early intervention.
(2) Create a susceptibility registry to include, but not be limited to, the
identification of infants susceptible to hearing loss, deaf or hard of hearing infants,
and infants susceptible to developing progressive hearing loss. Provide access to
and training on the early hearing detection and intervention data management
system to birth hospital newborn hearing screening supervisors and birth
hospital staff, freestanding birth center newborn hearing screening supervisors
and birth center staff, outpatient audiological testing providers, and other
necessary providers as deemed appropriate by the program.
(3) Provide to the hospitals and other birthing sites the susceptibility
questionnaire for infant hearing loss and require that the form be completed for any
newborn prior to discharge from the hospital or other birthing site. As to infants
susceptible to a hearing disability, copies of the completed susceptibility
questionnaire shall be distributed to the susceptibility registry of the office, the
parent or guardian, and, if known, the infant's primary care physician and the
provider of audiological services. Require all birth hospitals, freestanding birth
centers, and outpatient audiological testing providers to report newborn
Page 8 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 451 ENROLLED
hearing screening results, the reason for no screening, outpatient screening
results, and results of diagnostic audiological evaluation, including hearing
status, to the program.
(4) Require for all newborn infants that the hospital of birth or that hospital
to which the newborn infant may be transferred provide hearing screening for
hearing loss by auditory brainstem response (ABR) screening, evoked otoacoustic
emissions (EOAE) (OAE) screening, or any other screening device approved by the
office before discharge to identify children in need of further audiological
assessment. The results of that screening for hearing loss shall be provided to the
susceptibility registry of the office program, the parent or guardian, and if known,
the primary care physician and the provider of audiological services.
(5) Develop and provide to the birth hospitals, freestanding birth centers,
outpatient facilities, and pediatric diagnostic audiology centers or other birthing
sites appropriate written materials regarding hearing loss, and require that the
hospitals or other birthing sites provide this written material to all parents or
guardians of newborn infants for families of newborn infants, infants in need of
follow up after newborn hearing screening, infants with risk factors, or infants
diagnosed as d/Deaf or hard of hearing.
(6) Develop methods to contact parents or guardians of infants susceptible
to a hearing disability, of deaf or hard of hearing infants, and of infants susceptible
to developing progressive hearing loss. Develop and provide web-accessible early
hearing detection and intervention guidelines that include birthing facilities
newborn hearing screening guidelines, freestanding birth center newborn
hearing screening guidelines, outpatient hearing screening guidelines, and
pediatric diagnostic audiology guidelines.
(7) Establish a telephone hotline to communicate information about hearing
loss, hearing screening, audiological evaluation, and other services for deaf or hard
of hearing infants. Provide oversight of newborn hearing screening performance
at each birth hospital and freestanding birth center through monitoring of
newborn hearing screening data for completeness, accuracy, and timeliness.
Page 9 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 451 ENROLLED
Oversight monitoring criteria may be added or deleted by the office upon
recommendation of the advisory council created in R.S. 46:2265.
(8) Provide that when a screening indicates a hearing loss, audiological
evaluation shall be done as soon as practical. The parents or guardians of the infant
shall be provided with information on locations at which medical and audiological
follow up can be obtained. Maintain a website that promotes early hearing
identification and a coordinated system of support for children who are d/Deaf
and hard of hearing. In addition to program contacts and provider and family
resources, materials that stress the critical nature of addressing language and
communication development for children who are d/Deaf or hard of hearing
shall be made available.
(9) Provide that when the result of newborn hearing screening is referred
or further testing is needed, birth facilities shall provide families and caregivers
with follow-up hearing testing information inclusive of reason for follow-up,
what to expect, and appointment details, such as the date, time, location, and
contact information for follow-up, which is recommended to take place within
one month. In the circumstance that an appointment for follow-up is unable to
be established at the time of discharge from a birth hospital or freestanding
birth center, at a minimum, parents or guardians shall be provided with
information on locations for audiological follow-up.
(10) Provide that when a child is reported as d/Deaf or hard of hearing,
communication with families and caregivers regarding the importance of
enrolling in early intervention and referral to existing statewide opportunities
for children who are d/Deaf or hard of hearing in accordance with the Early
Hearing Detection and Intervention Act of 2022, 42 U.S.C. 201 and related
amendments shall occur as soon as is practical.
(11) Communicate with and connect families and caregivers of children
who are d/Deaf or hard of hearing to support services for the purpose of
building empowered families in Louisiana through access to individuals with
lived experience, direct emotional support, resources and training, and family
Page 10 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 451 ENROLLED
and community events aimed to build connection in accordance with the 42
U.S.C. 280g-1 and related amendments. No-cost, trained, and unbiased support
shall be provided through:
(a) Family-to-family support.
(b) Adults who are d/Deaf or hard of hearing.
B. The office shall consult with the advisory council and implement the
program.
C. The office shall develop a system for the collection of data, determine the
cost-effectiveness of the program, and disseminate statistical reports to the Louisiana
Commission for the Deaf. The program shall maintain a database for the
collection of early hearing detection and intervention data, and disseminate
information to partners and stakeholders. Information shall be shared annually,
at a minimum, with the advisory council for the Early Hearing Detection and
Intervention Program and the Louisiana Commission for the Deaf board of
commissioners.
D. The office, in cooperation with the state Department of Education, shall
develop a plan to coordinate early educational and audiological services for infants
identified as deaf or hard of hearing.
E. The office shall follow current practices and applicable guidelines that are
currently utilized in Louisiana and will shall consider practices and guidelines that
may be established by the National Institute on Deafness and other Communication
Disorders (NIDCD) established by the JCIH.
§2265. Advisory council creation; membership; terms; quorum; compensation
A. There is hereby created an advisory council for the program of early
identification of deaf hearing detection and intervention for d/Deaf or hard of
hearing infants. The council shall consist of fourteen twenty-one members as
follows:
(1) An otolaryngologist or otologist.
(2) An audiologist with extensive experience in evaluating infants.
(3) A neonatologist.
Page 11 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 451 ENROLLED
(4) A pediatrician.
(5) A deaf person who is d/Deaf, DeafBlind, or hard of hearing.
(6) A young adult who is d/Deaf, DeafBlind, or hard of hearing.
(6)(7) A hospital administrator.
(7)(8) A speech and language pathologist.
(8)(9) A school teacher or administrator certified in education of the deaf
d/Deaf and hard of hearing.
(10) An early intervention provider who works with children who are
d/Deaf or hard of hearing and their families.
(9)(11) A parent who chose the oral method for his deaf or hard of hearing
child of a child who is d/Deaf, DeafBlind, or hard of hearing who uses spoken
language.
(10)(12) A parent of a deaf or hard of hearing child utilizing total
communication who is d/Deaf, DeafBlind, or hard of hearing who uses sign
language or other mode of signed communication.
(11) A representative of the state Department of Education designated by the
superintendent of education.
(13) A person who is d/Deaf, DeafBlind, or hard of hearing and is the
parent of a child who is d/Deaf, DeafBlind, or hard of hearing.
(14) A parent of a child who is d/Deaf, DeafBlind, or hard of hearing who
is enrolled in early intervention.
(15) A representative from a Louisiana-based family support
organization for families whose children are d/Deaf or hard of hearing.
(16) A representative from the Louisiana Association of the Deaf.
(12)(17) A representative or designee of the office designated by the
assistant secretary of the office.
(13)(18) A representative or designee from the Louisiana Commission for
the Deaf.
(14) A representative from the Louisiana Association of the Deaf.
(19) A representative of the state Department of Education with
Page 12 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 451 ENROLLED
experience in d/Deaf education, special education, or early childhood designated
by the superintendent of education.
(20) A representative or designee of Louisiana Part C early intervention.
(21) A representative or designee from the Governor's Office of
Disability Affairs.
B. Members of the council in accordance with Paragraphs (A)(1) through
(10), (13), and (14) (16) shall be appointed by the governor, shall serve three-year
terms, and shall be subject to Senate confirmation. Other members are not subject
to Senate confirmation.
C. Members of the council in accordance with Paragraphs (A)(17) through
(21) representing offices and departments of state government shall serve four-year
terms concurrent with that of the governor and shall not be subject to Senate
confirmation. Other members shall serve three-year terms, except that in making the
initial appointments, four members shall be appointed for a one-year term, four shall
be appointed for two-year terms, and four shall be appointed for three-year terms. No
member may serve more than two consecutive terms.
D. Each member shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed
for actual travel and other expenses incurred in the performance of their duties
in accordance with travel regulations of the division of administration. Officers
of the council shall be reimbursed for necessary and other expenses incurred in
the performance of their duties.
E. A majority of the members of the council shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of all business.
F. The members of the council shall elect from their membership a chairman,
and a vice chairman, and secretary.
§2266. Powers, duties, functions of the advisory council
The advisory council shall:
(1) Advise and recommend risk factors or criteria for infants who are likely
deaf d/Deaf or hard of hearing and infants who may develop a delayed onset or
progressive hearing loss.
Page 13 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 451 ENROLLED
(2) Advise the office as to newborn hearing screening and follow-up, setting
standards for the program, monitoring and reviewing the program, and providing
quality assurance for the program.
(3) Advise the office as to integrating the program for early identification of
deaf detection of d/Deaf or hard of hearing infants with existing medical,
audiological, and early infant education programs.
(4) Advise the office as to materials, resources, and information to be
distributed to the public concerning deaf or hard of hearing infants early hearing
detection and intervention.
(5) Advise the office on the implementation of the program for early
identification and follow-up of infants susceptible to a hearing disability, deaf or
hard of hearing infants, detection and intervention for infants identified as d/Deaf
or hard of hearing and infants who are at risk of developing delayed onset or
progressive hearing loss.
§2267.Effective date; rules Rules and regulations
The office of public health shall, by July 1, 2000, adopt rules and regulations
necessary to implement maintain the program in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 14 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.